Utah statutes.
34-28-6.   Dispute over wages -- Notice and payment.

(1)  In case of a dispute over wages, the employer shall give written notice to the employee of the amount of wages that the employer concedes to be due and shall pay such amount without condition within the time set by this chapter.

(2)  Acceptance by an employee of a payment described in Subsection (1) does not constitute a release as to the balance of the employee's claim.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

